Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5908XS (2) 91 je/js S.F. 2277 Section 1. Section 731.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 731.1 Right to join union. 3 It is declared to be the policy of the state of Iowa that no 4 person within its boundaries shall be deprived of the right to 5 work at the personâs chosen occupation for any employer because 6 of membership in, or affiliation with, withdrawal or expulsion 7 from, or refusal to join, any labor union, organization, or 8 association, and any contract which that contravenes this 9 policy is illegal and void. 10 Sec. 2. Section 731.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 731.2 Refusal to employ prohibited. 13 It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association , or 14 corporation to refuse or deny employment to any person because 15 of membership in, or affiliation with, or resignation or 16 withdrawal from, a labor union, organization , or association , 17 or because of refusal to join or affiliate with a labor union, 18 organization or association . 19 Sec. 3. Section 731.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 731.3 Contracts to exclude unlawful. 22 It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association, 23 corporation , or labor organization to enter into any 24 understanding, contract, or agreement, whether written or 25 oral, to exclude from employment members of a labor union, 26 organization , or association , or persons who do not belong 27 to, or who refuse to join, a labor union, organization or 28 association, or because of resignation or withdrawal therefrom . 29 Sec. 4. REPEAL. Sections 731.4 and 731.5, Code 2026, are 30 repealed. 31